District of Columbia statutes.
9-421.05

Property exempt where prior assessment paid.

No property on which a legal assessment has been levied and paid for paving or repaving, curbing or curbing and guttering, on the roadway of any street, avenue, or road, shall be liable for any further assessment under this subchapter on account of the replacement of such pavement, curbing, or curbing and guttering.

History

Feb. 20, 1931, 46 Stat. 1198, ch. 246, § 5

Section References

This section is referenced in § 9-421.13.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 7-631.
1973 Ed., § 7-626.